Connecticut, session 2026, HB05218.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsections (c) to (e), inclusive, of section 10-151 of the
2 general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
3 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
4 (c) The contract of employment of a teacher who has not attained
5 tenure may be terminated at any time for any of the reasons enumerated
6 in subdivisions (1) to (6), inclusive, of subsection (d) of this section. [;
7 otherwise] The standard of review for all such reasons shall be just
8 cause. Otherwise the contract of such teacher shall be continued into the
9 next school year unless such teacher receives written notice by May first
10 in one school year that such contract will not be renewed for the
11 following year. Upon the teacher's written request, not later than three
12 calendar days after such teacher receives such notice of nonrenewal or
13 termination, a notice of nonrenewal or termination shall be
14 supplemented not later than four calendar days after receipt of the
15 request by a statement of the reason or reasons for such nonrenewal or
16 termination. Such teacher, upon written request filed with the board of
LCO No. 1536 1 of 7

Raised Bill No. 5218
17 education not later than ten calendar days after the receipt of notice of
18 [termination, or] nonrenewal or termination shall be entitled to a
19 hearing, except as provided in this subsection, (1) before the board, or
20 (2) if indicated in such request and if designated by the board, before an
21 impartial hearing officer chosen by the teacher and the superintendent
22 in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of this section. Such
23 hearing shall commence not later than fifteen calendar days after receipt
24 of such request unless the parties mutually agree to an extension not to
25 exceed fifteen calendar days. The impartial hearing officer or a
26 subcommittee of the board of education, if the board of education
27 designates a subcommittee of three or more board members to conduct
28 hearings, shall submit written findings and recommendations to the
29 board for final disposition. The teacher shall have the right to appear
30 with counsel of the teacher's choice at the hearing. A teacher who has
31 not attained tenure shall not be entitled to a hearing concerning
32 nonrenewal if the reason for such nonrenewal is either elimination of
33 position or loss of position to another teacher. [The board of education
34 shall rescind a nonrenewal decision only if the board finds such decision
35 to be arbitrary and capricious.] Any such teacher whose contract is
36 terminated for the reasons enumerated in subdivisions (3) and (4) of
37 subsection (d) of this section shall have the right to appeal in accordance
38 with the provisions of subsection (e) of this section.
39 (d) The contract of employment of a teacher who has attained tenure
40 shall be continued from school year to school year, except that it may be
41 terminated at any time for one or more of the following reasons: (1)
42 Inefficiency, incompetence or ineffectiveness, provided [, if a teacher is
43 notified on or after July 1, 2014, that termination is under consideration
44 due to incompetence or ineffectiveness, the] any determination of
45 incompetence or ineffectiveness is based on evaluation of the teacher
46 using teacher evaluation guidelines established pursuant to section 10-
47 151b; (2) insubordination against reasonable rules of the board of
48 education; (3) moral misconduct; (4) disability, as shown by competent
49 medical evidence; (5) elimination of the position to which the teacher
LCO No. 1536 2 of 7

Raised Bill No. 5218
50 was appointed or loss of a position to another teacher, if no other
51 position exists to which such teacher may be appointed if qualified,
52 provided such teacher, if qualified, shall be appointed to a position held
53 by a teacher who has not attained tenure, and provided further that
54 determination of the individual contract or contracts of employment to
55 be terminated shall be made in accordance with either (A) a provision
56 for a layoff procedure agreed upon by the board of education and the
57 exclusive employees' representative organization, or (B) in the absence
58 of such agreement, a written policy of the board of education; or (6)
59 other due and sufficient [cause] reasons. The standard of review for all
60 such reasons shall be just cause. Nothing in this section or in any other
61 section of the general statutes or of any special act shall preclude a board
62 of education from making an agreement with an exclusive bargaining
63 representative which contains a recall provision. Prior to terminating a
64 contract, the superintendent shall give the teacher concerned a written
65 notice that termination of such teacher's contract is under consideration
66 and give such teacher a statement of the reasons for such consideration
67 of termination. Not later than ten calendar days after receipt of written
68 notice by the superintendent that contract termination is under
69 consideration, such teacher may file with the local or regional board of
70 education a written request for a hearing. [A board of education may
71 designate a subcommittee of three or more board members to conduct
72 hearings and submit written findings and recommendations to the
73 board for final disposition in the case of teachers whose contracts are
74 terminated.] Such hearing shall commence not later than fifteen
75 calendar days after receipt of such request, unless the parties mutually
76 agree to an extension [,] not to exceed fifteen calendar days, [(A) before
77 the board of education or a subcommittee of the board, or (B) if indicated
78 in such request or if designated by the board] before an impartial
79 hearing officer chosen by the teacher and the superintendent. If the
80 parties are unable to agree upon the choice of a hearing officer not later
81 than five calendar days after the decision to use a hearing officer, the
82 hearing officer shall be selected with the assistance of the American
83 Arbitration Association using its expedited selection process and in
LCO No. 1536 3 of 7

Raised Bill No. 5218
84 accordance with its rules for selection of a neutral arbitrator in grievance
85 arbitration. [If the hearing officer is not selected with the assistance of
86 such association after five days, the hearing shall be held before the
87 board of education or a subcommittee of the board.] When the reason
88 for termination is incompetence or ineffectiveness, the hearing shall [(i)]
89 (A) address the question of whether the performance evaluation ratings
90 of the teacher were determined in good faith in accordance with the
91 program adopted by the local or regional board of education pursuant
92 to section 10-151b and were reasonable in light of the evidence
93 presented, and [(ii)] (B) be limited to twelve total hours of evidence and
94 testimony, with each side allowed not more than six hours to present
95 evidence and testimony except the [board, subcommittee of the board
96 or] impartial hearing officer may extend the time period for evidence
97 and testimony at the hearing when good cause is shown. Not later than
98 forty-five calendar days after receipt of the request for a hearing, the
99 [subcommittee of the board or] hearing officer, unless the parties
100 mutually agree to an extension not to exceed fifteen calendar days, shall
101 [submit written findings and a recommendation to the board of
102 education as to the disposition of the charges against the teacher and
103 shall send a copy of such findings and recommendation to the teacher.
104 The board of education shall give the teacher concerned its written
105 decision not later than fifteen calendar days after receipt of the written
106 recommendation of the subcommittee or hearing officer] render to the
107 board of education and the teacher a written disposition that shall be
108 binding on the parties. Each party shall share equally the fee of the
109 hearing officer and all other costs incidental to the hearing. [If the
110 hearing is before the board of education, the board shall render its
111 decision not later than fifteen calendar days after the close of such
112 hearing and shall send a copy of its decision to the teacher.] The hearing
113 shall be public if the teacher so requests. [or the board, subcommittee or
114 hearing officer so designates.] The teacher concerned shall have the right
115 to appear with counsel at the hearing, whether public or private. [A
116 copy of a transcript of the proceedings of the hearing shall be furnished
117 by the board of education, upon written request by the teacher within
LCO No. 1536 4 of 7

Raised Bill No. 5218
118 fifteen days after the board's decision, provided the teacher shall assume
119 the cost of any such copy.] Either party shall have the right to request a
120 copy of the transcript and shall bear the cost of any such copy. Nothing
121 [herein] contained in this section shall deprive a board of education or
122 superintendent of the power to suspend a teacher from duty
123 immediately when serious misconduct is charged without prejudice to
124 the rights of the teacher as otherwise provided in this section.
125 (e) Any teacher or board of education aggrieved by the [decision of a
126 board of education] award of the hearing officer after a hearing as
127 provided in subsection (d) of this section may [appeal therefrom, not
128 later than thirty calendar days after such decision, to the Superior Court.
129 Such appeal shall be made returnable to said court in the same manner
130 as is prescribed for civil actions brought to said court] make an
131 application to the Superior Court to confirm, vacate or modify said
132 award pursuant to sections 52-417 to 52-419, inclusive. Any such
133 [appeal] application shall be a privileged case to be heard by the court
134 as soon after the return day as is practicable. The teacher or board of
135 education shall file with the court a copy of the complete transcript of
136 the proceedings of the hearing, [and the minutes of board of education
137 meetings relating to such termination, including the vote of the board
138 on the termination,] together with such other documents, or certified
139 copies thereof, as shall constitute the record of the case. [The court, upon
140 such appeal, shall review the proceedings of such hearing. The court,
141 upon such appeal and hearing thereon, may affirm or reverse the
142 decision appealed from in accordance with subsection (j) of section 4-
143 183. Costs shall not be allowed against the board of education unless it
144 appears to the court that it acted with gross negligence or in bad faith or
145 with malice in making the decision appealed from.]
146 Sec. 2. Section 10-236a of the general statutes is repealed and the
147 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
148 (a) Each board of education, the State Board of Education, the Board
149 of Regents for Higher Education, the Board of Trustees for The
LCO No. 1536 5 of 7

Raised Bill No. 5218
150 University of Connecticut, and each state agency which employs any
151 teacher, and the managing board of any public school, as defined in
152 section 10-183b, shall protect and save harmless any member of such
153 boards, or any teacher or other employee of such boards, from financial
154 loss and expense, including payment of expenses reasonably incurred
155 for medical or other service necessary as a result of [an] any assault upon
156 such member, teacher or other employee while such person was acting
157 in the discharge of [his or her] such member, teacher or other employee's
158 duties within the scope of [his or her] such member, teacher or other
159 employee's employment or under the direction of such boards, state
160 agency, department or managing board, which expenses are not paid by
161 the individual member's, teacher's or employee's insurance, workers'
162 compensation or any other source not involving an expenditure by such
163 member, teacher or employee.
164 (b) Any member, teacher or employee absent from employment as a
165 result of injury sustained during [an] any assault, any act of challenging
166 behavior, as defined in section 10-222aa, or for a court appearance in
167 connection with such assault shall continue to receive [his or her] such
168 member, teacher or employee's full salary or contracted weekly wages,
169 while so absent, except that the amount of any workers' compensation
170 award may be deducted from [salary] any payments during such
171 absence. The time of such absence shall not be charged against such
172 member, teacher or employee's sick leave, vacation time, [or] personal
173 leave days or other accrued leave.
174 (c) Any person who suffers an ascertainable loss of money may bring
175 a civil action in the Superior Court to recover damages. In any action
176 brought by a person under this section, the court may award, to the
177 plaintiff, if the plaintiff prevails, in addition to the relief provided in this
178 section, reasonable attorney's fees and costs to be taxed by the court.
179 [(c)] (d) For the purposes of this section, the terms "teacher" and
180 "other employee" shall include any student teacher doing practice
181 teaching under the direction of a teacher employed by a local or regional
LCO No. 1536 6 of 7

Raised Bill No. 5218
182 board of education or by the State Board of Education or Board of
183 Governors of Higher Education, and any member of the faculty or staff
184 or any student employed by The University of Connecticut Health
185 Center or health services.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 10-151(c) to (e)
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 10-236a